Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.110

Tenure—Grounds for deprivation.

The tenure of every person holding an office, place, position, or employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during good behavior, and any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation privileges or other special privileges for any of the following reasons:

(1) Incompetency, inefficiency, or inattention to, or dereliction of duty;

(2) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct, insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow employee, or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure the public service; or any other willful failure on the part of the employee to properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations to be adopted hereunder;

(3) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the employee holds;

(4) Dishonest, disgraceful, or prejudicial conduct;

(5) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, or any other habit forming drug, liquid, or preparation to such extent that the use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or physical fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from properly performing the function and duties of any position under civil service;

(6) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;

(7) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment of the civil service commission is sufficient to show the offender to be an unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public service.

[ 2012 c 117 s 14; 1959 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]